Utah statutes.
63M-1-1105.   Qualifying local contributions.

Qualifying local contributions to the recycling market development zone may vary depending on available resources, and may include:

(1)  simplified procedures for obtaining permits;

(2)  dedication of available government grants;

(3)  waiver of business license or permit fees;

(4)  infrastructure improvements;

(5)  private contributions;

(6)  utility rate concessions;

(7)  suspension or relaxation of locally originated zoning laws or general plans; and

(8)  other proposed local contributions as the office finds promote the purposes of this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

